Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1127.
do enact as follows:AB1127,11Section 1. 48.02 (17m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB1127,3,4248.02 (17m) “Special treatment or care” means professional services which 3that need to be provided to a child or his or her family to protect the well-being of 4the child, prevent placement of the child outside the home, or meet the special 5needs of the child. “Special treatment or care” also means professional services 6which that need to be provided to the expectant mother of an unborn child to protect 7the physical health of the unborn child and of the child when born from the harmful 8effects resulting from the habitual lack of self-control of the expectant mother in the 1use of alcohol, controlled substances, or controlled substance analogs, exhibited to a 2severe degree. This term includes, but is not limited to, medical, psychological, or 3psychiatric treatment, speech therapy, alcohol or other drug abuse treatment, or 4other services which that the court finds to be necessary and appropriate.AB1127,25Section 2. 48.02 (17p) of the statutes is created to read:AB1127,3,7648.02 (17p) “Speech therapy” includes all habilitative and rehabilitative 7speech therapy services for which coverage is required under s. 632.895 (11m).AB1127,38Section 3. 49.46 (2) (b) 6. c. of the statutes is amended to read:AB1127,3,11949.46 (2) (b) 6. c. Speech, hearing, and language disorder services, including 10all habilitative and rehabilitative speech therapy services for which coverage is 11required under s. 632.895 (11m).AB1127,412Section 4. 609.73 of the statutes is created to read:AB1127,3,1513609.73 Coverage of speech therapies. Limited service health 14organizations, preferred provider plans, and defined network plans are subject to s. 15632.895 (11m).AB1127,516Section 5. 632.895 (11m) of the statutes is created to read:AB1127,3,1717632.895 (11m) Coverage of speech therapies. (a) In this subsection:AB1127,3,19181. “Habilitative services” means health care services that help a person keep, 19learn, or improve skills and functioning for daily living.AB1127,3,21202. “Habilitative speech therapy” means speech therapy that helps a person 21keep, learn, or improve skills and functioning for daily living.AB1127,4,2223. “Rehabilitative services” means health care services that help a person 1restore or improve skills and functioning for daily living that have been lost or 2impaired.AB1127,4,534. “Rehabilitative speech therapy” means speech therapy that helps a person 4restore or improve skills and functioning for daily living that have been lost or 5impaired.AB1127,4,1165. “Telehealth” means a practice of health care delivery, diagnosis, 7consultation, treatment, or transfer of medically relevant data by means of audio, 8video, or data communications that are used either during a patient visit or a 9consultation or are used to transfer medically relevant data about a patient. 10“Telehealth” does not include communications delivered solely by audio-only 11telephone, facsimile machine, or email.AB1127,4,1612(b) 1. Except as provided in par. (d), every disability insurance policy, and 13every self-insured health plan of the state or a county, city, town, village, or school 14district, that provides coverage for habilitative services shall provide coverage for 15habilitative speech therapy as a treatment for stuttering regardless of whether the 16stuttering is classified as developmental.AB1127,4,20172. Except as provided in par. (d), every disability insurance policy, and every 18self-insured health plan of the state or a county, city, town, village, or school 19district, that provides coverage for rehabilitative services shall provide coverage for 20rehabilitative speech therapy as a treatment for stuttering.AB1127,5,4213. Except as provided in par. (d), every disability insurance policy, and every 22self-insured health plan of the state or a county, city, town, village, or school 23district, that provides coverage for both habilitative services and rehabilitative 1services shall provide coverage for habilitative speech therapy as a treatment for 2stuttering regardless of whether the stuttering is classified as developmental and 3shall provide coverage for rehabilitative speech therapy as a treatment for 4stuttering.AB1127,5,75(c) 1. a. The coverage required under par. (b) may not be subject to any 6maximum annual benefit limit, including any limit on the number of visits an 7insured may make to a speech-language pathologist.AB1127,5,108b. The coverage required under par. (b) may not be limited on the basis of the 9type of disease, injury, disorder, or other medical condition that resulted in the 10stuttering.AB1127,5,1311c. The coverage required under par. (b) may not be subject to utilization review 12or utilization management requirements, including prior authorization or a 13determination that the speech therapy services are medically necessary.AB1127,5,15142. The coverage required under par. (b) shall include coverage of speech 15therapy provided in person or provided via telehealth.AB1127,5,2116(d) If the application of any requirement under this subsection to a qualified 17health plan, as defined in 42 USC 18021 (a) (1), would result in a determination 18that the state must make payments to defray costs under 42 USC 18031 (d) (3) and 1945 CFR 155.170, then the coverage requirements under this subsection do not apply 20to the qualified health plan until the application of the requirements under this 21subsection to the qualified health plan do not require the state to defray any costs.AB1127,622Section 6. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1127,6,523(1) Legislative intent. It is the legislature’s intent that, for purposes of 45 1CFR 156.115, the speech therapy benefits required under this act be considered 2substantially equal to the benefits required under the state’s EHB-benchmark plan, 3as defined in 45 CFR 156.20, and that, for purposes of 45 CFR 155.170, the speech 4therapy benefits required under this act be considered a benefit required by state 5action for purposes of compliance with federal requirements.AB1127,6,66(2) Qualified health plans.AB1127,6,117(a) Within 90 days following the effective date of this paragraph, the office of 8the commissioner of insurance shall determine whether the application of any 9speech therapy benefits required under this act to a qualified health plan, as 10defined in 42 USC 18021 (a) (1), is in addition to the essential health benefits 11required under federal law.AB1127,6,2112(b) If the office of the commissioner of insurance determines under par. (a) 13that the application of any speech therapy benefits required under this act is in 14addition to the essential health benefits required under federal law, then the office 15of the commissioner of insurance shall, within 180 days following the effective date 16of this paragraph, apply for a waiver under 42 USC 18052 or any other applicable 17federal law of any of the applicable cost defrayal requirements under 42 USC 18031 18(d) (3) and 45 CFR 155.170. In seeking a waiver of federal law under this 19paragraph, the office of the commissioner of insurance may propose changes to the 20state’s EHB-benchmark plan, as defined in 45 CFR 156.20, that are not in conflict 21with state law.AB1127,722Section 7. Initial applicability.AB1127,7,223(1) For policies and plans containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this 1act first applies to policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this 2subsection, except as provided in sub. (2).AB1127,7,73(2) For policies and plans that are affected by a collective bargaining 4agreement containing provisions inconsistent with this act, this act first applies to 5policy or plan years beginning on the effective date of this subsection or on the day 6on which the collective bargaining agreement is newly established, extended, 7modified, or renewed, whichever is later.AB1127,88Section 8. Effective date.AB1127,7,109(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 4th month beginning after 10publication.AB1127,7,1111